Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 13A Administrative Regulations
13A.190.
Emergency administrative regulations.

An emergency administrative regulation is an administrative regulation that:

An administrative body can clearly demonstrate, through documentary evidence submitted with the filing of the emergency administrative regulation, must be placed into effect immediately in order to:

Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, welfare, or the environment;

Prevent an imminent loss of federal or state funds;

Meet an imminent deadline for the promulgation of an administrative regulation that is established by state statute or federal law; or

Comply with an executive order issued under KRS Chapter 39A; and

Is temporary in nature and will expire as provided in this section; or

Is temporary in nature and will be replaced by an ordinary administrative regulation as provided in this section.

For the purposes of this section, “imminent” means within two hundred seventy (270) days of the filing of the emergency administrative regulation.

An agency’s finding of an emergency pursuant to this section shall not be based on the agency’s failure to timely process and file administrative regulations through the ordinary administrative regulation process.

An emergency administrative regulation:

Shall become effective and shall be considered as adopted upon filing;

Shall be published in the Administrative Register in accordance with the publication deadline established in KRS 13A.050(3);

Shall be subject to the public comment provisions established in KRS

13A.270

and

13A.280

;

May be reviewed at a subsequent meeting of a legislative committee after the filing of the emergency administrative regulation; and

May, by a vote of the majority of the legislative committee’s membership as established by KRS 13A.020(4) and 13A.290(9), be found to be deficient, and the deficiency shall be reported to the Governor pursuant to KRS 13A.330(2); and

May be amended:

By the promulgating administrative body after receiving public comments as established in KRS

13A.280

. The amended after comments version shall:

Become effective upon filing; and

Not require a statement of emergency; or

At a legislative committee meeting as established in KRS

13A.320

. The amendment shall be approved as established by KRS 13A.020(4) and KRS 13A.290(9). The amended version shall become effective upon adjournment of the meeting following the procedures established in KRS

13A.331

.

Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, emergency administrative regulations shall expire two hundred seventy (270) days after the date of filing or when the same matter filed as an ordinary administrative regulation filed for review is adopted, whichever occurs first.

If an administrative body extends the time for filing a statement of consideration for an ordinary administrative regulation as provided by KRS 13A.280(2)(b), an emergency administrative regulation shall remain in effect for two hundred seventy (270) days after the date of filing plus the number of days extended under the provisions of KRS 13A.280(2)(b) or when the same matter filed as an ordinary administrative regulation filed for review is adopted, whichever occurs first.

Filing an emergency amended after comments administrative regulation shall not affect the expiration of an emergency regulation as established in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.

Except as established in subsection (6) of this section, an emergency administrative regulation with the same number or title or governing the same subject matter shall not be filed for a period of two hundred seventy (270) days after it has been initially filed.

If an emergency administrative regulation with the same number or title or governing the same subject matter as an emergency administrative regulation filed within the previous two hundred seventy (270) days is filed, it shall contain a detailed explanation of the manner in which it differs from the previously filed emergency administrative regulation. The detailed explanation shall be included in the statement of emergency required by subsection (7) of this section.

Each emergency administrative regulation shall contain a statement of:

The nature of the emergency;

The reasons why an ordinary administrative regulation is not sufficient;

Whether or not the emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by an ordinary administrative regulation;

If the emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by an ordinary administrative regulation, the following statement: “The ordinary administrative regulation (is or is not) identical to this emergency administrative regulation.”;

If the emergency administrative regulation will not be replaced by an ordinary administrative regulation, the reasons therefor; and

If applicable, the explanation required by subsection (6) of this section.

An administrative body shall attach the:

Statement of emergency required by subsection (7) of this section to the front of the original and each copy of a proposed emergency administrative regulation;

Public hearing and public comment period information required by KRS 13A.270(2), regulatory impact analysis, tiering statement, federal mandate comparison, fiscal note, summary of material incorporated by reference if applicable, and other forms or documents required by the provisions of this chapter to the back of the emergency administrative regulation; and

Documentary evidence submitted justifying the finding of an emergency in accordance with subsection (1) of this section to the back of the emergency regulation if it is:

No more than four (4) pages in length; and

Typewritten on white paper, size eight and one-half (8-1/2) by eleven (11) inches, and single-sided.

Larger volumes of documentary evidence shall be filed in a separate binder or on a CD-ROM or DVD disc.

An administrative body shall file with the regulations compiler:

The original and five (5) copies of the emergency administrative regulation; and

At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, an electronic version of the emergency administrative regulation and the attachments required by paragraph (a) of this subsection saved as a single document for each emergency administrative regulation in an electronic format approved by the regulations compiler.

The original and four (4) copies of each emergency administrative regulation shall be stapled in the top left corner. The fifth copy of each emergency administrative regulation shall not be stapled. The original and the five (5) copies of each emergency administrative regulation shall be grouped together.

The statement of emergency shall have a two (2) inch top margin. The number of the emergency administrative regulation shall be typed directly below the heading “Statement of Emergency.” The number of the emergency administrative regulation shall be the same number as the ordinary administrative regulation followed by an “E.”

Each executive department emergency administrative regulation shall be signed by the head of the administrative body and countersigned by the Governor prior to filing with the Commission. These signatures shall be on the statement of emergency attached to the front of the emergency administrative regulation.

If an emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by an ordinary administrative regulation, the ordinary administrative regulation shall be filed at the same time as the emergency administrative regulation that it will replace.

If an ordinary administrative regulation that was filed to replace an emergency administrative regulation is withdrawn:

The emergency administrative regulation shall expire on the date the ordinary administrative regulation is withdrawn; and

The administrative body shall inform the regulations compiler of the reasons for withdrawal in writing.

If an emergency administrative regulation that was intended to be replaced by an ordinary administrative regulation is withdrawn, the emergency administrative regulation shall expire on the date it is withdrawn.

If an emergency administrative regulation has been withdrawn, the ordinary administrative regulation that was filed with it shall not expire unless the administrative body informs the regulations compiler that the ordinary administrative regulation is also withdrawn.

If an emergency administrative regulation is withdrawn, the administrative body shall inform the regulations compiler of the reasons for withdrawal in writing.

The administrative regulations compiler shall notify all legislative committees of the number, title, and subject matter of all emergency administrative regulations and shall forward any additional information filed about the emergency administrative regulation requested by a legislative committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 19, effective April 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 71, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 425, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 20, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 406, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 89, § 8, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 100, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; 2016 ch. 82, § 12, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 7, § 4, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.200.
Administrative regulation in contemplation of a statute — Procedure.

An administrative regulation in contemplation of a statute provides a means whereby an administrative body may promulgate and file an administrative regulation following the enactment of a statute authorizing or directing its promulgation by the General Assembly and its approval by the Governor or its becoming law without signature but before the effective date subject to the following:

The administrative regulation may be filed any time after signature by the Governor or upon the act becoming law without the Governor’s signature but prior to the act’s effective date;

The administrative regulation may be reviewed, hearings held, and all other steps taken with regard thereto, except for adoption, prior to the effective date of the statute that authorized or directed its issuance;

All dates and other procedures that apply to an ordinary administrative regulation shall apply to an administrative regulation in contemplation of a statute; and

An administrative regulation in contemplation of a statute shall in all other respects be considered as an ordinary administrative regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 20, effective April 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 410, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 2016 ch. 82, § 13, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.210.
Tiering of administrative regulations.

When promulgating administrative regulations and reviewing existing ones, administrative bodies shall, whenever possible, tier their administrative regulations to reduce disproportionate impacts on certain classes of regulated entities, including government or small business, or both, and to avoid regulating entities that do not contribute significantly to the problem the administrative regulation was designed to address. The tiers, however, shall be based upon reasonable criteria and uniformly applied to an entire class. Administrative bodies shall use any number of tiers that will solve most efficiently and effectively the problem the administrative regulation addresses. A written statement shall be submitted to the Legislative Research Commission explaining why tiering was or was not used.

Administrative bodies may use, but shall not be limited to, the following methods of tiering administrative regulations:

Reduce or modify substantive regulatory requirements;

Eliminate some requirements entirely;

Simplify and reduce reporting and recordkeeping requirements;

Provide exemptions from reporting and recordkeeping requirements;

Reduce the frequency of inspections;

Provide exemptions from inspections and other compliance activities;

Delay compliance timetables;

Reduce, modify, or waive fines or other penalties for noncompliance; and

Address and alleviate special problems of individuals and small businesses in complying with an administrative regulation.

When tiering regulatory requirements, administrative bodies may use, but shall not be limited to, size and nonsize variables. Size variables include number of citizens, number of employees, level of operating revenues, level of assets, and market shares. Nonsize variables include degree of risk posed to humans, technological and economic ability to comply, geographic locations, and level of federal funding.

When modifying tiers, administrative bodies shall monitor, but shall not be limited to, the following variables:

Changing demographic characteristics;

Changes in the composition of the workforce;

Changes in the inflation rate requiring revisions of dollar-denominated tiers;

Changes in market concentration and segmentation;

Advances in technology; and

Changes in legislation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 21, effective April 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 516, § 21, effective July 13, 1990; 2003, ch. 89, § 9, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 165, § 4, effective July 13, 2004.

13A.215.
Use of administrative regulation management application — Paper-based filing requirements — Notification to the regulations compiler.

An administrative body may use an administrative regulation management application developed and maintained by the Legislative Research Commission, if available, to satisfy the following requirements of this chapter:

Paper-based filing requirements; and

Notifications to the regulations compiler.

If the filing and notification requirements of this chapter are not available in the administrative regulation management application, the administrative body shall use the paper-based process established by this chapter.

Paper-based shall include any procedure in this chapter that requires an administrative body to file or submit a hard copy to the compiler.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 125, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

13A.220.
Compliance with KRS 13A.222 and 13A.224 required — Filing with compiler — Format.

All administrative regulations shall comply with the provisions of KRS

13A.222

and

13A.224

.

An administrative body shall file with the regulations compiler:

The original and five (5) copies of an administrative regulation; and

At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, an electronic version of the administrative regulation and required attachments saved as a single document for each administrative regulation in an electronic format approved by the regulations compiler.

If there are differences between the paper copy and the electronic version of an administrative regulation filed with the regulations compiler, the electronic version shall be the controlling version.

The original and four (4) copies of each administrative regulation shall be stapled in the top left corner. The fifth copy of each administrative regulation shall not be stapled. The original and the five (5) copies of each administrative regulation shall be grouped together.

An amendment to an administrative regulation shall not be made on a copy of the administrative regulation reproduced from the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service or the Administrative Register. It shall be a typed original in the format specified in subsection (4) of this section.

The format of an administrative regulation shall be as follows:

An administrative regulation shall be typewritten on white paper, size eight and one-half (8-1/2) by eleven (11) inches and shall be double-spaced through the last line of the body of the administrative regulation. The first page shall have a two (2) inch top margin. The administrative regulation shall be typed in a twelve (12) point font approved by the regulations compiler. The lines on each page shall be numbered, with each page starting with line number one (1). Pages of an administrative regulation and documents attached to the administrative regulation shall be numbered sequentially. Page numbers shall be centered in the bottom margin of each page. Copies of the administrative regulation may be mechanically reproduced;

The regulations compiler shall place a stamp indicating the date and time of receipt of the administrative regulation in the two (2) inch margin on the first page;

The cabinet, department, and division of the administrative body shall be listed on separate double-spaced lines two (2) inches from the top in the upper left hand corner of the first page. This shall be followed on the next double- spaced line by “(New Administrative Regulation),” “(Amendment),” “(Amended After Comments),” “(Repealer),” “(New Emergency Administrative Regulation),” “(Emergency Amendment),” “(Emergency Amended After Comments),” or “(Emergency Repealer),” whichever is applicable;

The notation shall be followed by the number and title of the administrative regulation on the next double-spaced line. The promulgating administrative body shall contact the regulations compiler prior to filing to obtain an administrative regulation number for a new administrative regulation;

On the next double-spaced line following the number and title of an administrative regulation, after the words “RELATES TO:,” the administrative body shall list all statutes and other enactments, including any branch budget bills or executive orders, to which the administrative regulation relates or which shall be affected by the administrative regulation. After the words “STATUTORY AUTHORITY:” the administrative body shall list the specific statutes and other enactments, where applicable, authorizing the promulgation of the administrative regulation. Federal statutes and regulations shall be cited in the “RELATES TO:” and “STATUTORY AUTHORITY:” sections as provided by KRS 13A.222(4)(n) and (o); and

Following the citations provided for in paragraph (e) of this subsection, and following the words “NECESSITY, FUNCTION, AND CONFORMITY:” the administrative body shall include a brief statement setting forth the necessity for promulgating the administrative regulation, a summary of the functions intended to be implemented by the administrative regulation, and, if applicable, the statement required by KRS 13A.245(2)(b).

The numbering within the body of an administrative regulation shall be the responsibility of the promulgating body, subject to the authority of the regulations compiler to divide or renumber an administrative regulation. The following format shall be used by the administrative body in the numbering of each administrative regulation. Each section shall begin with the word “Section” followed by an Arabic number, and titles of sections shall be initially capitalized. Subsections shall be designated by an Arabic number in parentheses. Paragraphs shall be designated by lower case letters of the alphabet in parentheses (e.g., (a), (b), (c), etc.). Subparagraphs shall be designated by an Arabic number followed by a period (e.g., 1., 2., etc.). Clauses shall be designated by lower case letters of the alphabet followed by a period (e.g., a., b., c., etc.). Subclauses shall be designated by lower case Roman numerals in parentheses (e.g., (i), (ii), (iii), etc.). A section shall not be divided into subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, clauses, or subclauses if there is only one (1) item in that level of division.

After the complete text of an administrative regulation, on the following page, the administrative body shall include the following information:

If the provisions of KRS 13A.120(3) are applicable, a statement that the official or the head of the administrative body has reviewed or approved the administrative regulation; the signature of such official or head; and the date on which such review or approval occurred;

The authorizing signature of the administrative body promulgating the administrative regulation, and the date on which the administrative body approved the promulgation;

Information relating to public hearings and the public comment period required by KRS

13A.270

; and

The name, position, mailing address, telephone number, e-mail address, and facsimile number of the contact person of the administrative body. The contact person shall be the person authorized by the head of an administrative body to:

Receive information relating to issues raised by the public or by a legislative committee prior to a public meeting of the legislative committee;

Negotiate changes in language with a legislative committee in order to resolve such issues; and

Answer questions relating to the administrative regulation.

The format for signatures required by subsection (6)(a) and (b) of this section shall be as follows:

The signature shall be placed on a signature line; and

The name and title of the person signing shall be typed immediately beneath the signature line.

An administrative body shall prominently display on its Web site:

A notice that an administrative regulation has been filed with the Commission;

A summary of the administrative regulation including:

The number of the administrative regulation;

The title of the administrative regulation; and

Any changes made if it is an existing administrative regulation;

Information on how to access the administrative regulation on the Commission’s Web site; and

The dates of the public comment period and the place, time, and date of the scheduled public hearing as well as the manner in which interested parties shall submit:

Notification of attending the public hearing; and

Written comments.

A letter of request, notification, or withdrawal required to be filed with the regulations compiler pursuant to this chapter may be filed electronically if the letter:

Is on the administrative body’s official letterhead; and

Contains the signature of a representative of that administrative body.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to the letters required by KRS 13A.320(2)(b) for amendments at a legislative committee meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 22, effective April 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 425, § 7, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 22, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 387, § 13, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 410, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 330, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 38, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 406, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 89, § 10, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 100, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 4, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 14, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 7, § 5, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.221.
Division of subject matter of administrative regulation.

An administrative body shall divide the general subject matter of administrative regulations it promulgates into topics. A separate administrative regulation shall be promulgated for each topic.

An administrative body shall not incorporate all material relating to a general subject matter in one (1) administrative regulation. Material incorporated by reference shall be incorporated by reference in the administrative regulation governing the specific topic to which the material relates.

When an administrative regulation is promulgated, the administrative body shall review the administrative regulation, whether it is new or amended, in its entirety for compliance with the requirements of KRS Chapter 13A and current law governing the subject matter of the administrative regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 516, § 12, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 406, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2016 ch. 82, § 15, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.222.
Drafting rules.

In a new administrative regulation, there shall be no underlining or bracketing.

In an amendment to an administrative regulation, the new words shall precede the deleted words. The administrative body shall:

Underline all new words; and

Place the deleted words in brackets and strike through these words.

An administrative regulation shall not be amended by reference to a section only. An amendment shall contain the full text of the existing administrative regulation being amended. All changes made to the text of the existing administrative regulation shall be marked as required by subsection (2) of this section.

A section of an administrative regulation shall not be reserved for future use.

In drafting administrative regulations, the administrative body shall comply with the following requirements:

The administrative body shall use plain and unambiguous words that are easily understood by laymen. The administrative body shall avoid ambiguous, indefinite, or superfluous words and phrases;

A duty, obligation, or prohibition shall be expressed by “shall” or “shall not.” “Should,” “could,” or “must” shall not be used. The future tense shall not be expressed by the word “shall.” A discretionary power shall be expressed by “may”;

The words “said,” “aforesaid,” “hereinabove,” “hereinafter,” “beforementioned,” “whatsoever,” or similar words of reference or emphasis shall not be used. Where an article may be used, the administrative body shall not use the word “such.” It shall not use the expression “and/or” and shall not separate alternatives with a slash. It shall not use contractions. When a number of items are all mandatory, the word “and” shall be used. When all of a number of items are not mandatory, the word “or” shall be used;

Certain words are defined in the Kentucky Revised Statutes. Where applicable, these definitions shall be used. Definitions appearing in the Kentucky Revised Statutes shall not be duplicated in a proposed administrative regulation. A reference shall be made to the chapters and sections of the Kentucky Revised Statutes in which the definitions appear. The format for this reference shall be: “(“Defined term”) is defined by KRS (specific citation).”;

If definitions are used, they shall be placed in alphabetical order in the first section of an administrative regulation or in a separate administrative regulation.

If definitions are placed in the first section of an administrative regulation, the definitions shall govern only the terms in that administrative regulation.

The section shall be titled “Definition.” or “Definitions.”

A definition shall not be included in a definitions section if the defined term is not used in that administrative regulation or the material incorporated by reference in that administrative regulation.

If definitions are placed in a separate administrative regulation, that administrative regulation shall be the first administrative regulation of the specific chapter of the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service to which the definitions apply.

The title of the administrative regulation shall contain the number of the chapter of the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service to which the definitions apply and shall be in the format: “Definitions for (title number) KAR Chapter (chapter number).”

A definition shall not be included in a definitions administrative regulation if the defined term is not used in an administrative regulation in that specific chapter or the material incorporated by reference in an administrative regulation in that chapter.

In the text of an administrative regulation, the word defined in the definitions section, rather than the definition, shall be used.

Definitions shall be used only:

When a word is used in a sense other than its dictionary meaning, or is used in the sense of one of several dictionary meanings;

To avoid repetition of a phrase; or

To limit or extend the provisions of an administrative regulation.

Definitions shall not establish requirements or standards;

If a word has the same meaning as a phrase, the word shall be used;

The present tense and the indicative mood shall be used. Conditions precedent shall be stated in the perfect tense if their happening is required to be completed;

The same arrangement and form of expression shall be used throughout an administrative regulation, unless the meaning requires variations;

If” or “except” shall be used rather than “provided that” or “provided, however.” “If” shall be used to express conditions, rather than the words “when” or “where”;

A word importing the masculine gender may extend to females. A word importing the singular number may extend to several persons or things;

Any reference in an administrative regulation to “medical doctor,” “M.D.,” or “physician” shall be deemed to include a doctor of osteopathy or D.O., unless either of those terms is specifically excluded;

An administrative body shall use the phrases specified in this subsection:

Unless the authority for an administrative regulation is an appropriation provision that is not codified in the Kentucky Revised Statutes, the specific chapter and section number of the Kentucky Revised Statutes authorizing the promulgation of an administrative regulation shall be cited.

If an act has not been codified in the Kentucky Revised Statutes at the time an administrative regulation is promulgated, or if the authority is any branch budget bill, the citation shall be as follows: “(year) Ky. Acts ch. (chapter number), sec. (section number).” When an act has been codified, the administrative body shall notify the regulations compiler of the proper citation in writing. Upon receipt of the written notice, the regulations compiler shall correct the citation.

For acts of extraordinary sessions, the citation shall be as follows: “(year) (Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. (chapter number), sec. (section number).” If there is more than one (1) extraordinary session of the General Assembly in the year, the citation shall specify the specific extraordinary session, as follows: “(year) (2d Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. (chapter number), sec. (section number).”

When an act has been codified, the administrative body shall notify the regulations compiler of the proper citation of the Kentucky Revised Statutes in writing. Upon receipt of the written notice, the regulations compiler shall correct the citation.

If the statutory authority is an appropriation act, the citation shall be as follows: “(year) Ky. Acts ch. (chapter number), Part (part and subpart numbers).”

If the authority is an executive order, the citation shall be as follows: “EO (year executive order issued)-(number of executive order);

If the statutory authority is a federal statute, the citation shall be the:

United States Code (U.S.C.), if it has been codified; or

Public Law (Pub. L.) and official session laws, if it has not been codified;

If the statutory authority is a federal regulation codified in the Code of Federal Regulations, the citation shall include the title, part, and section number, as follows: “(title number) C.F.R. (part and section number).”

If the statutory authority is a federal regulation that has not been codified in the Code of Federal Regulations, the citation shall be to the Federal Register, as follows: “(volume number) Fed. Reg. (page number) (effective date of the federal regulation) (section of Code of Federal Regulations in which it will be codified).”

When the federal regulation is codified, the citation shall be amended to read as provided by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.

If the statutory authority is a federal regulation that has been amended, and the amendment is not reflected in the current issue date of the volume of the Code of Federal Regulations in which the federal regulation is codified, the citation shall be to the Federal Register as follows: “(federal regulation that has been amended), (volume number) Fed. Reg. (page number) (effective date of the amendment).”

When the amendment is codified in the appropriate volume of the Code of Federal Regulations, the citation shall be amended to read as provided by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph;

Citations of items in the “RELATES TO” paragraph of an administrative regulation shall comply with paragraphs (m), (n), and (o) of this subsection; and

An administrative regulation may cite the popular name of a federal or state law if the first usage of the popular name in that administrative regulation is accompanied by the citation required by this subsection.

Do Not Use: Use: And/or “and” for a conjunctive “or” for a disjunctive Any and all either word As provided in this administrative regulation —— And the same hereby is is Either directly or indirectly —— Except where otherwise provided State specific exemption. Final and conclusive final Full force and effect force or effect In the event that; In case if Including but not limited to State the specific items to be included. Is authorized; Is empowered may Is defined and shall be construed to mean means Is hereby required to shall It shall be lawful may Latin words Do not use unless medical or scientific terminology. However, “et seq.” may be used for citations. Null and void and of no effect void Order and direct either word Provision of law law Until such time as until Whenever if;

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 425, §§ 1, 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 23, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 387, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 410, § 13, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 9, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 406, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 100, § 7, effective June 20, 2005; 2011, ch. 73, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 138, § 5, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 16, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.224.
General requirements for incorporation by reference.

No material shall be incorporated by reference unless:

The material incorporated by reference relates only to the specific subject matter governed by an administrative regulation;

The material has been reviewed in detail by the administrative body;

No state statute or federal law prescribes the same or similar procedure, or sets forth a comprehensive scheme of regulation of the subject matter; and

Its incorporation is necessary in order to:

Implement, interpret, or prescribe law or policy authorized or required by statute; or

Establish or describe the organization, procedure, or practice requirements authorized or required by statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 425, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 24, effective July 13, 1990; 2016 ch. 82, § 17, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.2245.
Incorporation of code or uniform standard by reference.

An administrative body may incorporate by reference a code or uniform standard if a federal or state statute:

Requires or authorizes an administrative body to implement, or a regulated entity to comply with, the provisions of that code or uniform standard; and

Does not set forth the code or uniform standard, or a comprehensive scheme of regulation.

If a code or uniform standard is changed by the administrative body, the administrative body shall:

Clearly state the provisions in the body of the administrative regulation that are different than those included in the code or uniform standard; and

File with the regulations compiler a:

Copy of the code or uniform standard;

Summary listing the pages upon which changes have been made; and

Detailed summary of the changes and their effect.

The summaries shall be attached to the back of the proposed administrative regulation.

If a federal regulation requires an administrative body to adopt, develop, or implement material of a scientific or technical nature that does not lend itself to the format requirements of KRS Chapter 13A, the administrative body may incorporate the material by reference in an administrative regulation as provided by KRS

13A.2251

and

13A.2255

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 516, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 406, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 100, § 8, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 6, effective July 12, 2012.